Wyoming statutes. Title 2 Wills, Decedents' Estates and Probate Code
Article 4. Disclaimers

§ 2-1-401.
Right to disclaim.

Any person may disclaim any interest in property which without a disclaimer he would receive by gift, bequest, devise, inheritance, beneficiary designation, the exercise of a power of appointment or would pass by right of survivorship.

Except to the extent a fiduciary’s right to disclaim is expressly restricted or limited by another statute of this state or by the instrument creating the fiduciary relationship, a fiduciary may disclaim any interest in property which without a disclaimer he would receive by gift, bequest, devise, inheritance, beneficiary designation, the exercise of a power of appointment or would pass by right of survivorship, whether acting in a personal or representative capacity. A fiduciary acting under a power of attorney shall have the right to disclaim an interest in property if expressly authorized to disclaim the interest under the terms of the instrument creating the power of attorney.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 1; 1980, ch. 54, § 1; 1997, ch. 82, § 1; 2005, ch. 126, § 2.

The 2005 amendment

designated the former undesignated paragraph as (a), and in (a) inserted “beneficiary designation, the exercise of a power of appointment” after “inheritance”; and added (b).

Laws 2005, ch. 126, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 25, 2005.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Creditor's right to prevent debtor's renunciation of benefit under will or debtor's election to take under will, 39 ALR4th 633.

§ 2-1-402.
Definitions.

As used in Article 4:

“Any interest in property” includes, but is not limited to an undivided portion of an interest and a power with respect to property;

“Disclaimer” means an irrevocable and unqualified refusal by a person to accept an interest in property;

“Fiduciary” means a personal representative, trustee, agent acting under a power of attorney or other person authorized to act as a fiduciary with respect to the property of another person.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 1; 1980, ch. 54, § 1; 2005, ch. 126, § 2.

The 2005 amendment

added (a)(iii) and made a stylistic change.

Laws 2005, ch. 126, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 25, 2005.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Interest in property. —

Probate estate, personal representatives, and beneficiaries were awarded judgment on a chapter 7 trustee's complaint to set aside a debtor's renunciation of his interest as an heir under a will as a fraudulent conveyance under 11 U.S.C.S. § 548(a)(1), (2) because the renunciation passed the property directly from the testator to other beneficiaries, there was no transfer of an interest in the property, and the effect of the relation back provision under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 2-1-404(a)(ii) was that the debtor never owned the interest.
Royal v. Sanford (In re Sanford), 352 B.R. 885, 2006 Bankr. LEXIS 3555 (Bankr. D. Wyo. 2006), rev'd, 369 B.R. 609, 2007 Bankr. LEXIS 914 (B.A.P. 10th Cir. 2007).

§ 2-1-403.
Qualification; effective date.

To qualify as a disclaimer:

There shall be a written irrevocable and unqualified refusal by the disclaimant to accept an interest in property; and

The writing shall be received by the transferor of the interest, his legal representative or the holder of the legal title to the property to which the interest relates within nine (9) months after the later of:

The day on which the transfer creating the interest in the person is made; or

The day on which the person attains age twenty-one (21); and

The disclaimant has not accepted the interest or any of its benefits; and

As a result of a refusal under this subsection, the interest passes without any direction on the part of the person making the disclaimer and passes either:

To the spouse of the decedent; or

To a person other than the person making the disclaimer.

A written transfer of the transferor’s entire interest in the property shall be treated as a qualified disclaimer if the written transfer:

Meets requirements similar to the requirements of paragraphs (a)(ii) and (iii) of this section; and

Is to a person who would have received the property if the transferor had made a qualified disclaimer within the meaning of subsection (a) of this section.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent the disclaimant from benefits as an income beneficiary of any trust established by the transferor’s will.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 1; 1980, ch. 54, § 1; 1987, ch. 80, § 1.

§ 2-1-404.
Disposition of disclaimed interest.

Unless otherwise expressly provided in the deed of gift or will:

The interest disclaimed reverts to the transferor if he is living on the date of disclaimer; or

The interest disclaimed passes under the residuary clause of transferor’s will if he died prior to the disclaimer. If the disclaimant is a residuary beneficiary under the will the interest disclaimed passes as though the disclaimant did not survive the transferor.

If the transferor died intestate prior to the disclaimer, the interest disclaimed passes under the laws of descent and distribution as though the disclaimant did not survive the transferor.

If the interest disclaimed would have passed by right of survivorship, the interest shall pass as though the disclaimant was not a survivor.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 1; 1980, ch. 54, § 1; 1987, ch. 73, § 1; 1997, ch. 82, § 1.

Relation back. —

Probate estate, personal representatives, and beneficiaries were awarded judgment on a chapter 7 trustee's complaint to set aside a debtor's renunciation of his interest as an heir under a will as a fraudulent conveyance under 11 U.S.C.S. § 548(a)(1), (2) because the renunciation passed the property directly from the testator to other beneficiaries, there was no transfer of an interest in the property, and the effect of the relation back provision under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 2-1-404(a)(ii) was that the debtor never owned the interest.
Royal v. Sanford (In re Sanford), 352 B.R. 885, 2006 Bankr. LEXIS 3555 (Bankr. D. Wyo. 2006), rev'd, 369 B.R. 609, 2007 Bankr. LEXIS 914 (B.A.P. 10th Cir. 2007).

Cited

in

Norman v. Schulte, 107 B.R. 763, 1989 Bankr. LEXIS 2000 (Bankr. D. Wyo. 1989).

§ 2-1-405.
Disclaimer on behalf of person under disability.

A duly appointed, qualified and acting guardian of the property of an incompetent or a person under the age of twenty-one (21) years may make a disclaimer on behalf of his ward, upon a showing satisfactory to the court having jurisdiction over the guardianship that the disclaimer is in the best interests of the ward. A guardian of the property may be appointed by the court for the sole purpose of filing with the court an application for approval of a disclaimer.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 142, § 1; 1980, ch. 54, § 1.